Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.417

Hydroelectric reservoir extending across international boundary—Agreement with Province of British Columbia.

To carry out a treaty between the United States of America and Canada, a city that maintains hydroelectric facilities with a reservoir which extends across the international boundary, may enter into an agreement with the Province of British Columbia for enhancing recreational opportunities and protecting environmental resources of the watershed of the river or rivers which forms the reservoir. The agreement may provide for establishment of and payments into an environmental endowment fund and establishment of an administering commission to implement the purpose of the treaty and the agreement.

[ 1984 c 1 s 1.]